
                   Overall he was a pretty cool professor. Cared about the students and the grade they ended up with at the end.
                
                   I took Dr. Anwar's Seminar in International Management (MGT 6330) online.  Be prepared to write 8-10+ pages per week.  Directions are often not clear (e.g. "Respond to two articles. 3 paragraphs." Ok, 3 paragraphs each or combined?)  Online resource links are a jumbled mess.  Grading is fair and an A is easily attainable by putting in effort.
                
                   Not easy, but as long as you can write clearly very easy. Thats not to say there isnt work to be done, there is too much, it just isnt hard. Short presentation but if you try you get an A. Smart man, knows alot, but is pretty outdated.
                
                   Anwar is an excellent professor. As long as you put effort in the class you will pass! You do have to do a presentation but it's pretty easy. He is very helpful if you need anything or have questions.
                
                   Tough professor, but fair.  The challenge with this online class was the weekly assignment and discussion assignments which require extensive research with multiple references. Also, he has a comprehensive, yep I mean extremely comprehensive online repository that he looooves to remind you about how great it is.  He's right, it was useful.
                
                   Best professor at WT. Just google business marketing and see who pops up. Really. Do it.
                
                   Overal a decent professor. Has lame jokes. &lt;some still funny&gt;
                
                   Dr. Anwar is a brilliant professor. Like everyone else has said, he keeps folders on all of the major companies and can recall details about them with ease. He gave us a list of questions to study for the tests, but the answers are very detailed to you do have to devote a lot of time to studying. I've heard that his other classes are easier.
                
                   Anwar is very knowledgeable and very interesting.  Keeps a profile on every company ever, probably.   Watch out for his dry sense of humor, he watches too much Jay Leno.
                
                   Dr. Anwar is so knowledgeable! I wouldn't be surprised to find that he knows the background on every company in the world! He's funny and generates interest in marketing! I would sign up for his class any day!
                
                   Dr. Anwar is the bomb. He is so funny and laid back.  I would take one of his classes any day.
                
                   I loved him! He was funny and interesting and made the class fun.
                
                   Dr. Anwar rocks. He is the best marketing professor by far
                
                   Funny man. Pretty liberal when goes to his teaching and testing.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very easy class! Weekly quiz and exam question and answers can be found on google easily. Its an easy A :)
                
                   Great online class. Material is clear cut. Exam materials can easily be found in the outside world.  Weekly chapter quizzes, 7 discussion boards, and 2 exams, no direct final! If you take her in class, there are group projects. NO group projects online!
                
                   Tends to rant about is old days, doesn't cover most of the material needed for the exams. The exams are ridiculous, 50 questions most a paragraph long for a background story and only gives you 60 mins to respond. Impossible to reach never responds to emails. He seems to focused on his photography or breaking bad tours to care about class.
                
                   I'm a good student for the record. But his tests are unreasonably hard. It's at the point where if I had studied twice as hard, I still would have made the same grade.
                
                   Exam grades are based on group exams. You are part of a group of 5-6 other students. There is no credit for your own work. If you have loser team mates, they will destroy your A. Professor rarely answers emails, does not use a text book, and will not help you if you have non-participating group members. He just expects you to do the work for them.
                
                   Great professor.  Encouraged group projects to split the work and exams were done as a group.  He is eager to answer questions when you need help and fast responses.  Best class I took so far. I wish he taught more classes.
                
                   Grading for Class participation is unreasonable for an online class.
                
                   Good teacher, Beware of tricky multiple choice tests. Overall good teacher but not an easy class by any means.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Lampo is seriously the best professor I've had at A&M. She is SO helpful and understanding and you can tell she has such a passion for teaching marketing. I absolutely adored this class (maybe because I also love marketing) but even if you aren't a marketing major it's an easy class to enjoy. I always look forward to it. Thanks Dr. Lampo!!!
                
                   Wonderful professor! She makes the course enjoyable and really cares about the students. One of my favorite professors so far!
                
                   nice lady, easy class
                
                   This class wasn't too difficult.  Dr. Pride is a bit quirky and can provide some interesting real world examples. However, the unceasing monotony that comprised the lectures may have you sleeping before you know it.
                
                   Dr. Pride is great!  He gives lots of real world examples to help you understand, and he's extremely friendly.  The course isn't easy, though, you definitely have to keep up with the ready and take good notes!
                
                   Hard class take another professor if you have the chance! I have heard he is the hardest for marketing and I believe it now!!!
                
                    I'm taking a class with dr zafar right now at MSM-Kuwait,he is the most offensive professor I have ever taken class with,extremely full of himself rude to students thinks that all others are fools,uses an explicit language that violates the boundaries of appropriateness and politeness. I was looking forward to learn marketing of service but he ro
                
                   so bad 
                
                   Took a course with him in Saudi Arabia (PSU) when he teached for a year. Just write a lot, his grading is based on quantity not quality. Very careless but freindly
                
                   A very bright and intelligent professor who has experience.
                
                   iam taking a class with dr zafar right now in lebanon and i as a student am very proud to have such a doctor with this infinite knowledge about everything and he is very helpful and communicates with his students with a high level of care as they were his children
                
                   He's a guest lecturer. Feeling great wif his great knowledge but still irritated wif some manner.
                
                   I took his class online and found the assignments very unorganized. He revised his syllabus 3 times within 3 weeks. The assignments were tedious and burdensome. I had to drop the class. I'm a graduate student and never had to drop a class before. If you take this instructor be prepared to start working the very first day and to commit a lot of time
                
                   Knows what the course is about
                
                   This guy is awesome!  Very funny and entertaining.  He is not a jerk like some say here.  He has a hard time answering questions and sometimes it is hard to understand him.  He is not a hard teacher and cares about your success.
                
                   Do NOT take online.  His assignments are not clearly explained.  When you ask a question he usually will not answer it directly...dances around the issue.  Very rude and extremely full of himself.  The work is not hard..he just makes it that way.
                
                   The most offensive professor I have ever taken. He told my class to go to hell at least once a week. If you are an international student save your self the harassment and take another professor. This man is a true jerk. The class itself is not that difficult, just read the book and write a lot.doesn't care about the quality cares about the length.
                
                   Extremely proud. Thinks that all others are fools. Will never respond to specific questions. Makes fun of others, and thus avoids the real issues that pertain to marketing. Believes in exploiting his students, by asking them to work on his own research work. If you want &quot;A&quot; from him, be ready to write a research paper with him.That is his criterion
                
                   He made it very easy, great proffesor made his work easier and understands the course very well.
                
                   Will not answer questions. Is very argumentative and offending. His assignments are unclear as well.
                
                   I was offended at the kind of language that he uses in class and he kids way too much about subjects that may be inappropriate.
                
                   I do agree with the last comment
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His class turned me off to marketing and I am sad that I didn't listen to my friends who warned me not to take him.
                
                   Great professor.  He seems to know alot about marketing.  I hope that he sticks around for a while.
                
                   Excellent professor, really knows his stuff.  He is tough and doesn't give out easy A's which is why  many students dislike him.  But, a fantastic professor.  I learned a lot.
                
                   Good teacher. She was very helpful and understanding if there were technical problems. Her tests were challenging but doable. There are a few papers to write, a big team project, and 3 tests. I would take her class without hesitation.
                
                   Horrible experience for Intro class online. Exams are 6 chapters each & 3 hours to complete it. YOU WILL NEED ALL 3 HOURS. Discussion posts are expected, but make sure your answers are spot on. Huge expectations with no hardly any guidance. Had us write up a Marketing Plan by group. Not an easy task if taking online and your first Marketing class
                
                   She really wants her students to succeed and is very helpful and approachable. Returns emails and phone calls in a timely manner.  I dreaded this class going in, but ended up loving it.
                
                   Hard subject made easier because she shows you how to do it.
                
                   As mentioned before there are several short papers, though nothing insurmountable.  I see where people said he was rather curt, however he was always very reasonable in my interactions with him.  Not the most difficult class, so long as you read, and keep up with the work.
                
                   Follow the syllabus and you will be fine.
                
                    Assignments are clear-cut, do the work and you will get an A. Lots of short papers to write, so keep up with them. The guidelines for his assignments are all over the place, sometimes contradictory, so make sure you ask him about it even though sometimes he rudely answers or copy & pastes from syll. Professor isn't helpful. Just do the work.
                
                   Instructor replies to questions with cut and paste statements from the syllabus. He does not provide detailed responses to students. He does not use the online course grade book and instead sends individual points through email, which have to be added up and maintained by the student to determine your grade. Unreasonable deadlines. Very confusing!
                
                   Instructor is very clear about assignments. Student should follow the guidelines for assignments and things will be fine. Very important: Every page the instructor wants should be included by the student.
                
                   The Prof. is crystal clear about what he requires- which was ideal for an online course imo...Defintely a writing intensive class, but if you put in work an 'A' is attainable. His final is difficuly but he is very fair
                
                   At first i was very overwhelmed taking this with MGT 527 Capstone. Then turned out this was my easy class. Just do exactly what he tells you Abstract, ToC, 5 pages, Appendix and your fine I got 100's on all my assignments! Great material too I actually enjoyed the case studies.
                
                   At first, difficult to determine what he was looking for, but if you really dig deep and analyze the syllabus, you will get it.  Read.  Write. Combine and follow directions as you should in any business, you will do good.  I really enjoyed this class a lot and you will too. Remember, this is a masters level course. You will work!!!
                
                   Tired of doing exactly what you were told, and STILL getting C's on your assingments and exams?  Need to bring up your GPA?  Look no further.  Yes, this class is more work intensive than most.  HOWEVER, if you do the work exactly how tells you(minimum pages and references, etc), you WILL get your A.  He's definately hard, but very fair.
                
                   Condescending towards students. Gives vague directions and does not reply to questions, just copies/pastes syllabus. Focuses more on meeting rubric criteria than the quality of the work. Make sure and meet all criteria (# of pages, toc, and do not forget the appendix!!!). He will fail the assignment if you miss one thing, or are a few sentences shy of the page minimum. Tests are brutal, you have 60 minutes for 50 questions, but at least they are straight from the book.
                
                   This is one of the best professors I have had. I took this as a summer course and yes, the writing was intense - but easy. He says you have to read but the only thing you really have to read is the cases. The other papers you can just look up the answers in the book. Lots of work, but easy A if you just do the work.
                
                   This was an online course.  Very writing intensive but material is easily comprehensible with some degree of subjectivity.  Prof responds quickly and instructions are very clear.  Does not require weekly webinars.  Would definitely take again.
                
                   All he does is talk about himself and all of his accomplishments and how he worked for Motorola lol.  3 tests, 100 questions, no review all true false and multiple choice.  You have to take him so go in prepared to read the book cover to cover.
                
                   2 tests with no review so you have to read. no final, one group project. really cares about students. gave a pretty big curve at the end of the semester. probably better to take online since tests are staright from the book
                
                   online course: not very practical assignments. The syllabus states part of our grade is from group projects consisting of presentations by ea. group member, power point presentations, etc. Kind of har to present in an online class!!!
                
                   This class was the biggest joke.  The professor didn't follow the book at all.  He wanted you to know the concept of the book.  The test were subjective to the point were it is confusing.  I took this class twice and had to drop the first time.  Since he is the only professor for this course I had to take again.  I made a C and I am a A-B student.
                
                   At first this course was very challenging. The instructor gives you direction of where to find all information for the test, but you do have to follow through. Read and reread his directions. Use your book to its fullest including the website and its quizzes. I will say I didn’t like the class at first, but came to enjoy it.
                
                   Terrible Instructor.   Less than sixty seconds to answer test questions containing material that is not covered in assignments. Hypothetical questions with multiple, multiple choice answers. No lecture.  Inaccurate/tardy replies.  Slow to grade assignments. Need I say more?
                
                   If you are looking for a course that enables you to find all of the answers to the test within the book, look elsewhere. This course was very challenging and requires thorough reading of the text. This course requires you to incorporate the text which is present within each test. I would recommend this course for those who are willing to study.
                
                   Tests with answers that don't appear anywhere in the book.  Speculative questions with multiple-choice-multiple answer format.  Unwilling to be lenient when technological issues arise.  Without a doubt one of the worst professors I've ever had.  Turned a tedious and difficult class into a nightmare and considered a constant C average on tests good.
                
                   He is slow to grade and not helpful. His hints on how to do better in the class are worthless. The worst class that I have taken at this school.
                
                   He was a great instructor. I've worked with him before I had his class so I kind of knew what to expect. Plus I heard great things about him before I took his class.
                
                   This class is not hard, but the prof is. Communications is a great subject that I typically excel in, but he puts nothing into the class. No lecture, no reviews, just read the book and then suffer through his off the wall tests. He isn't helpful and he's slow to grade. All tests are conceptual and difficult. I'm working my tail off for a B+
                
                   This Professor is not of a benefit to the student. A Professor's job is to teach his students. His tests were over the wall; 80 questions to be taken in 90 minutes. That is 1.26 minutes per question, with many of the question multiple answers in a multiple choice question. I took this course 2 times and dropped it both times.
                
                   I found this professor to be quite difficult to follow, hard to contact, and very, very slow to grade assignments.
                
                   He motivated me and he challenge students to do well. One of the best teachers I have had and he teaches life lessons and tie it to the material cover. Class is fun and interesting. If you do your work you will do well, but if lazy choose another teacher.  He uses the book so get it.
                
                   For the real review look up Chris Meyers instead of myer chris. Lacks Clarity on his assignments and discussion. Good Guy. Just don't know how to teach this course. Its an entry level course for a graduate degree program. Mold your students don't discourage them.  If you want to do that, go back in the private sector.
                
                   Just focus on practices exams, and you'll get almost A in exams, the only problem is the project worth 300/900, and it's hard to know what he wants u to do.
                
                   NIce lady, but is using software to generate weekly quizzes instead of creating her own from what she choices to cover. We're in class 1 of the 2 days. Not really learning anything and I was ready to learn. But I gave up trying to learn just so that I can try to make an A. Final is a personal mkt. project. It would be cool if she was more hands on
                
                   This class was hard. Keep at it and work hard. Don't expect to take this class with her and have an easy grade. 
                
                   Extremely easy class.  Took while working full time with another course in the summer. This class required little effort and was an easy A.  2 weekly assignments and professor is an easy grader.  HIGHLY RECOMMEND.
                
                   This class was entirely easy. No surprises. Syllabus is straight forward an not intimidating. Highly recommend as an elective and especially if you have a huge class load like I did.
                
                   I was unsure of my grade early on in the semester, but Dr. Kernek posted it and it was smooth sailing after that.  I lost my grandfather and she was very considerate. The class is straight forward. It wasn't any surprises as there have been in other classes I have taken. What you read in the textbook is what you will be graded on. I received an A.
                
                   Pretty straight forward class. You will need to use photoshop or something similar to do the articles. I see complaints on communication but I didn't have any, she does take a while to grade assignments but this class was pretty easy for me. Exams are essay answer 3 out of 5. If your looking for an A this is the class,just do the work, I recommend.
                
                   This was an interesting course, and the workload was light. The professor was great at helping whenever I had questions. Be sure to read the text. The exams come straight from the book, but they can be a bit difficult. 3 exams, 1 project completed over the entire semester, and discussion board assignments. I would recommend Dr. Kernek!
                
                   As a mktg person, I found this class & prof to be very fair and interesting.  I learned from posts and interactions through other students. Some test &#63;'s were  little tough with hidden text details, BUT with posts & case reports, it all balances out well.  This class wasn't too difficult & you can take this with another course in same semester.
                
                   3 exams, a personal marketing plan, 5 easy book Q/A's, and weekly dicussions...That's all there was to this course. I almost completely stopped reading the book after the 4th week and still got an A. Wouldn't say I learned much, but the personal marketing plan may be useful in the future. If all you want is a decent grade, she's a good pick.
                
                   I have a totally different opinion from some previous posts. Although Dr. Kernek is not helping at all (maybe bcoz she's having baby), but it does a fun and interesting class that I ever take. Just post discussions, do assignments (mostly posters, so u'll need some skills of using graphic software), and exams are from text (read closely).
                
                   ITS GRAD SCHOOL SO IT SHOULD BE CHALLENGING. BUT PROFS. SHOULD NOT BE UNFAIR, CONTRADICTIVE, & UNRESPONSIVE! HER SILLY IN-CLASS EXERCISES WERE NO TEST PREP. TESTS WERE HARD, ONLINE AND FOCUSED ON BURIED DETAILS IN THE CHAPTER. SHE HAD NO CURVE AND NO CONCERN FOR STUDENTS. I WANTED TO LEARN-OR AT LEAST AN EASY &quot;A&quot; TO BALANCE MY LOAD-IF THATS U.AVOID
                
                   Signed up for an on site class at TAMU Commerce Campus.  Ended up with an ecollege class because she always had an excuse for not being there the last 6 weeks.  Tests are not based on theory, but on memorizatio of minute details from throughout the assigned chapters.  She stinks!!!  Don't take this class if she's the professor.
                
                   Her classes should be called ?correspondence courses'.Although I came out with an ?A?, it wasn?t due to her great teaching.She was not helpful in the least bit! Takes her 2-3 days to respond to anything.Basically you teach yourself; you read the book, you post discussions and you study for the exams.Who selects the teachers at TAMU-C&#63;
                
                   2nd class with her. This was online. Quizzes over every 2 chapters that had 20 multiple choice questions. Very easy just look up definitions in book. Final was choice of 6 out of 12 essay questions.
                
                   Class was relatively easy.  The exams are hard, but everything balances out with the journal articles.  You could definitely take this class and several others and still make an A.  Highly recommended!!!
                
                   I would have never expected to meet such an uninvolved, unhelpful and unresponsive professor. Avoid!!!!! Do not take this class with this professor unless you do not care about working alone and about learning nothing!
                
                   I have no idea why this prof. has gotten such harsh ratings.  She is very enthusiastic about Marketing and definitely fair.  Multiple guess tests were challenging (but this is grad school). I would definitely recommend taking her MKT 521 class.
                
                   Absolutely worthless instructor.  No feedback.  Minimally responds to students &quot;begging&quot; for responses - and answers after the fact.  No way does she respond in 24-48 hours.  Quizes have wrong answers and are totally confusing.  DO NOT take this class with this &quot;instructor&quot; - that is if you want to learn anything.  Terrible experience.
                
                   Very unhelpful teacher, relies on students to answer each others questions and if she ever does answer a question it's only a one liner that doesn't answer the question half the time. Very frustrating class so far! (Online)3 Exams and a Marketing Plan paper, no rounding up or curve. If you get a 79.9% it's a C.
                
                   WORSE PROFESSOR EVER! AVOID LIKE THE PLAGUE! 1. NEVER responds to emails/virtual office. 2. quizzes are vague and NO ONE understands them. 3.unorganized! 4.walking contradiction-syllabus says she doesn't like email-only virtual office, will reply within 24 hrs. WRONG! Haven't see any of this yet! BEWARE!
                
                   Probably the best professor I have had at TAMU-C. If you have the opportunity to take his class take it! I wish other professors would take note on how he runs his classes
                
                   Dr. Little is very knowledgeable in his field. I took this course online and he was very open to assisting students with any questions. Assignment include: lesson discussions, one article summary, two tests, and a research paper.
                
                   Awesome professor! One of the best at TAMU-C. I would recommend him to any student. I wish all of the classes were like his
                
                   If you're an education seeker, stay away from this class.  If you're a credential seeker, like me, you'll LOVE it here!  Easy A.  He doesn't even use the book!  The tests are all based off the lectures!
                
                   You want to keep your GPA above 3.0 in grad school, and the best way to do that is by taking the easy classes first; instead of going with the instinct of getting harder classes out of the way. That said, this class with this professor should be the first that you take. It's the easiest A you'll ever get. Discussions, 1 exam, 2 papers. That's IT!
                
                   Great Professor. Very humble. Makes you work hard. Good Grader. Would love to take another class.
                
                   Excellent professor. Had 2 exams and he was very fair. The papers had to follow strict APA guidelines. I would highly recommend this professor for this class - BA 595. His grading was very fair unlike other TAMUC professors especially the ones in the finance department.
                
                   This was an excellent professor. This was my first semester at the University and I was very pleased with his teaching style and grading. A+++++++
                
                   Good teacher, listener and communication.
                
                   This was the Research class for EMBA.  This class was a lot of work, but overall worth it.  At first it is overwhelming, but if you do your assignments weekly, it builds up to the final product and then the last 2 weeks aren't that hard.  Basically my entire paper was written by week 9, so week 10 was just putting together the power point.
                
                   You will NOT regret taking MGT 527 from this professor!
                
                   Take this professor for Strategic Management.  He is beyond fair and a nice professor.
                
                   Clear instructions, easy pace online.  Read the couple of chapters per week, make a discussion post and take a quiz.  One 14 page research paper, fair grader and good overall course.
                
                   Dr. Little prefers Charlie. Very personable, with weekly discussion questions that posting to can earn extra credit, as well as learn from classmates. Allowed research topic not on list as it pertained to text topics.  Great prof - fully recommend him! (online spring 2010).
                
                   There is a lot to this course including discussions, essays and a publishable research paper.  Keep up with the suggested time line and you should be fine.  Prof was nice and there were no lectures.  Very self directed. Would take another from him.
                
                   Online class. Was structured to allow self-paced progression through the syllabus. Very interesting subject matter.
                
                   This is my third class with Dr. Little. He is very reasonable.His syllabus is crystal clear. Highly recommend. Will definitely take more classes from him.
                
                   the concept of marketing was very interesting, but the material was not delivered very well.  don't feel like i good a good understanding of the class.  the textbook was useless.  he did not follow the text book at all.  nothing within the notes could be traced back to the book for further clarification.
                
                   Just finished this online class. Charlie is really nice, and responsive professor. Quiz every week, but it's not hard if u study the textbook. The 12-14 pages paper takes time, prepare earlier, then you'll be fine.
                
                   Completed the MBA Mgt 501 in 1 1/2 weeks. The 20 pg paper was the most diff part of the course. Read the book and its pretty easy!
                
                   I took this class during the summer, the class had so much assignments for a 4 weeks course.  The teacher requested four HW assignments, one 20 pages paper, discussion, and a final exam that he didn't even grade.  Teacher instructions are no clear at all.  He didn't grade any HW until the last week, he excuse was that he was busy with his grandkids
                
                   My first online class and I have to say Prof Odom develops a strong partnership with you as a student of his class. I had some challenges with work going off shore and being limited to access my PC and he worked with me to the last minute. It was a tough 30 days, but I would definitely take Prof Odom's class in a regular semester...
                
                   Tough class due to the nature of the assignments and all the complex calculations, excel use, and diagrams.  I will say I did learn a lot from reading and re-reading the text material.  Professor did respond to my emails and was clear in his follow up.  
                
                   Most of the time he doesn't even know how to work the problems. Tests consist of 40 multiple choice and truefalse questions and several math problems. He never goes over anything except the problems & sometimes problems show up on the test that he didn't go over at all. Be ready to read! There's 6 chapters on each test.
                
                   A LOT of writing! One of the other reviews said it was boot camp, couldn’t have said it better myself. The material is easy, but if you are not comfortable spitting out 5-10 page papers every week, don’t bother. Prof seemed to be a fair grader, but he did take a while to post grades.
                
                   Terrible Professor. He should be let go, and never 'teach again.' He takes forever to respond to emails, and when he does respond he answers only part of it.  Also, hardly no participation in his end. I don't recommend him at all.  Waste of time and money with this professor.  Very frustrating class.  Lots of work too and late on grading!
                
                   Terrible Professor.  He should be let go, and never 'teach again.' He takes forever to respond to emails, and when he does respond he answers only part of it.  Also, hardly no participation in his end. I don't recommend him at all.  Waste of time and money with this professor.  Very frustrating class.  Lots of work too!
                
                   Second class with Dr. Odom, and it was great! One exam (midterm) that covers the entire book. Second half of semester is for a group project. The final is over an individual case study, but was easy. Be sure and get in a good group! Makes it much easier! I will definitely recommend Dr. Odom for any class!
                
                   Unfortunately, not very helpful. Very few responses to virtual office & when he did the responses were not clear. The weekly sections weren't open on a timely basis and never participated in discussions. He wasn't very involved with the class.
                
                   Dont bother asking for help because you will not get it, as a matter a fact he won't even email you back or reply to post in the virtual office. Upon the end of the class none of us knew what our grade was or would be as only 50% of the items were graded. Student emails poured out asking what was going on and still no response. Made an A on my own.
                
                   This is a pretty easy class. Some things were unclear to me, but Mr. Odom was very helpful. Lots of reading and writing, but it's not too hard. Easy A if you keep up with the assignments and discussions!
                
                   Dr. Odom is cool. The class was easy. He does not use the traditional textbook approach to teaching, instead he uses regular books that provide real life examples. You have to write a couple of papers for the class, but its not too bad. As long as you follow the syllabus and put in a decent amount of effort into your work you will get an A.
                
                   No communication, no clarity on assignments and no response to repeated emails.
                
                   Mostly 20-30 page papers and lots of discussions.  You have discussions on the readings, current events, and your final paper.  Be sure to include all the main points from the text in your paper and you should get an A.
                
                   He is INCREDIBLY helpful
                
                   Books are not traditional texts but business/consumer oriented. Some audiobook versions can be found. Lots of discussions and some papers. Grading is lenient.
                
                   Teacher grades fairly.  Tough reading and writing assignments.  Keep up on your assignments and you will do fine.  You will learn a lot in this class from doing all the assignments.
                
                   This class was on line and very demanding on assignments. There were only two tests including final and some quizzes, but a lot of additional work. I enjoyed this class and learned a lot. So long you will keep up with the work and due dates you will be fine.
                
                   Managing at The Edge class was great. Based on management techniques used by company's today that may be considered unorthodox. Very interesting class if you're interested in how businesses are run from the top down. Instructor even offered to let me borrow one of his personal books for a report when I couldn't find it on the web.
                
                   He seems like an interesting man, but he will keep you for at least an hour every day to talk about his wife and other issues that do not apply to the class.
                
                   I learned a lot in this course, but I did feel it was a bit much at times. She has a lot of busy assignments throughout the semester in addition to a group project. The group project was difficult to manage online. If you do all of your work and meet deadlines there is no reason you shouldn't earn an A.
                
                   Read the material and pay attention to due dates. Prof Rogers sends out lots of emails so there's no problem with communication. The team project wasn't great but whatever just do your share of the work. Keep track of your test questions during the semester bc you'll see them again on the final!
                
                   due dates are important
                
                   The professor was ask to teach the class at a moments notice by the Dean.  Despite the short notice the professor's delivery of the information was very good and immediately useful in my workpalce.
                
                   The professor was ask to teach the class at a moments notice by the Dean.  Despite the short notice the professor's delivery of the information was very good and immediately useful in my workpalce.
                
                   The professor was slow in responding to email, if she did at all, and she seem to belittle her students. The students I spoke to you were lost in the class. She never really taught in the real sense of the word. She only assigned reading and to look over PP slides. I think she borrowed info from another prof. maybe Myers. The worst online class.
                
                   Very knowledgeable. Approachable. Requires you to participate and rewards you for doing do. Took her for an online course. Would highly recommend!
                
                   AWESOME PROFESSOR! His lectures are hularious and time flies by fast! Take him for anything you possibly can, especially if its a maymester :)
                
                   very understanding...he wants you to pass, and tries his hardest to make you!!!
                
                   Great teacher, some daily course work and quizes, but he like's to keep the class average around 80 ;)
                
                   Good teacher, funny guy, will work with you on your grade.
                
                   Great teacher- a good amount of work, but he gives lots of extra credit and easy points. Usually a take home final. Totally reccommend him!
                
                   Def. take Dr. Black!! HE&quot;S AWESOME!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Daily busy work can be overwhelming, but easy class. Didn't have to read the textbook. Took in Summer, very fast paced, but worth it. I got a B, didn't do all the work.
                
                   I have taken him for Principles of Marketing, Basic Advertising, & Consumer Behavior. Not easy but not hard, lots of daily busy work that will kill you if you don't do it, fairly easy to get a B, takes effort to get an A
                
                   Really nice and funny guy.  Can be a bit corny at times, but I looked past it.  At his core, he really wants to help out his students, and it's probably one of my favorite classes I've taken in the past couple years
                
                   Very Nice Guy!!  Makes things easy to understand.  Some take home tests and basically tells you whats on the tests.  Allows you a cheat sheet and very helpful and understanding to athletes.
                
                   I enjoyed taking Dr. Lovelands class. She is very energetic and shares a lot of stories to get the point across. She gets distracted sometimes and goes off topic, but she always keeps you pretty entertained. Discussion boards and quizzes for every chapter are required for this course, but overall the class is easy as long as you do your reading.
                
                   I took Dr. Loveland two times for one class. In the Fall I earned a grade of "F" and in the Spring I earned a grade of "C" for the course. She restructured the course over the break to be more focused on in-class assignments (such as quizzes and exams).  I would like it if her grading was more clear (both in the syllabus and in feedback). 
                
                   No help  whatesover. Students are accountable when it comes to strict grading, yet she didn't let us no any of our scores till yesterday, the day before drop. I thought I had been doing good, but apparently I have a 51. You have to post 8 times a week just to get discussion points.. oh and 1 minute per question on the quiz. Doesn't respond or help
                
                   Dr. Loveland is quite a character. She's very knowledgeable and very eager to help, but she can be pretty unclear at times. You really need to sit down and get to know the syllabus and BB9 page if you want to do well. She's good at being both vague, as well as incredibly specific. She can be a bit of a hard grader, but she wants you to do well. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROFESSOR ONLINE. I do the assignments every week and still have a D in the class because the professor is NOT clear about her grading criteria and what she does provide is very confusing. I'm a senior now, been taking online classes and this one SUCKS. Professor sucks at replying to emails in a timely fashion. 
                
                   For Sales Management, she had us do a half-online half-in class lecture, giving us lots of time to work on the group project (heavily weighted). She can see a little scatter-brained, but she has loads of real world experience and loves to help students that have questions with any assignments. I'll be taking her again next semester.
                
                   absolute WORST teacher on this campus. I took an online class with her, not only did she not reply to anyone's emails, her instructions were always vague. She assigned a group project for an online class that required us to meet. WHO DOES THAT FOR AN ONLINE CLASS? As a warning, DON NOT TAKE HER IF YOU DON'T HAVE TO.
                
                   I have taken her courses before in lecture and it was much simpler than online. It was very confusing on what she wanted and the information that she provided was all over the place. Take her in lecture not online
                
                   Slow to reply to emails, hard grader, requires you to post on the class blog 8 times a week along with spending countless hours doing the actual assignments that have due dates. Everything comes from a test bank and shows no interest in the students. Tests are timed with 1 minute per question. Do not take her online.
                
                   I'm a straight A student who can breeze through a cours but this was not one of them. This class requires a LOT, I mean a LOT of attention. One chapter will have a quiz & video exercise that can take up to 3 hours if you're looking for that A. There is built in extra credit but that does not make up for the harsh grading. Would NOT suggest online
                
                   I took her online.  Maybe in person she's much better.  But the online class was very confusing.  She tries to be really organized I think, but instead makes everything much harder than it needs to be.  The online quizzes were ridiculous.  Would not recommend.
                
                   I took the online summer session class and enjoyed it very much.  Dr. Loveland was attentive to the class discussions posted and offered helpful tips when students posted concerns about the their quizz grades.  If you keep up with the reading and assignments, you should do well.  Take advantage of the extra credit offerings.
                
                   Introduction to internet marketing was a joke. The teacher is VERY unclear. I think that because this is an online class the guidelines should be crystal clear. Not in this case. There was a ridiculous project due at the end of the semester that had NOTHING to do with the class except you used the internet! I will NEVER take one of her classes agai
                
                   I took the online version of this class. It was a lot more work then I thought it would be but still better than the in person class. There are a lot of tests, article reviews, and discussions but they're not too hard. If you spend time on it and work hard you should end up with an A.
                
                   She is a very good teacher, very funny and interesting lectures. But r tests r bloody hard, but you make it up with homework n attendance. but wats up with her grading the assignments, she's like in a bad mood or something.
                
                   She's AWESOME! She designs the class so that your quizzes and homework will bring up your grade tremendously so its cool if you're not a good test taker lk myself.The class is laid back and she has a good sense of humor. Just keep up with the quizzes and do your article reviews and you'll get at least an easy B
                
                   Great professor, non-traditional style class, I highly recommend for a change, just make sure you go to the classes, she makes them fun and interesting though, and know's a lot about marketing.
                
                   Great guy, he's as clear as the corpus christi beach water (not!).  He explains very well and has very extensive experience in what he teaches; that's awesome!
                
                   Excellent professor who treats students fairly and accuretly expects a lot, but will work with you!!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   cool class
                
                   If you enjoy someone proficient in the English language, you're out of luck. Hard to get a hold of due to her commuting from Laredo to Kingsville. Irritating woman, but study, work and attend class and you'll pass.
                
                   She made class fun to attend.  Study hard and get an A. She gives corrections on test also to bring up your average.
                
                   This guy has a great personality and the class was pretty easy. I enjoyed it, and did not think I would. My problem, however, is that if you have a problem, he is completely unwilling to help. He only answers emails if they are positive. Four times throughout the semester I asked questions and was ignored, but he answered all other messages.
                
                   Took MKT 3346 online during SU I 2011 and received an &quot;A&quot;.  Not very interesting, but overall a good class.  Professor is a character and seems to like to have fun with his work. He provides lecture and 90 to 95% of the test questions came from that.  Book was rarely used.
                
                   This teacher is horrible. He doesn't care about you as a student, has no idea what he is talking about or what is on his computer generated test. Not willing to work with you on grades, and is never in his office. He is way to full of himself and possibly the worst teacher I have ever had.
                
                   Awesome teacher...willing to help and work with the students and their individual needs!
                
                   Took tons of classes with De'armond---enjoyed every one...especially Organizational Behavior.
                
                   What a horrible teacher. No doubt the worst that I've ever had in college. Very fake. Acts like he's cool in class, but a complete jerk about grades. Tests do not reflect material covered in class at all. The guy is a &quot;big baby&quot; literally and figuratively. He doesn't care about you, so be careful because he is not a trustworthy or caring teacher.
                
                   great class extremly excited about teaching, a must take professor
                
                   Good teacher.  If you study for the tests and do the few assignments there are, it's an easy A.  He's really funny and makes the class entertaining.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is pretty brash and hardline when it comes to feedback. However I learned a lot in this class. 
                
                   This guy takes his problems at home out on students. He talks about his ex-wife and scribbles incoherently on the dry erase board. A total noob. Smiles in your face and gives C & Ds on work based on subjective assignments given. NEVER uses the textbook. He thinks he knows more than what a text can provide. A real ego/psycho-maniac. NOT IMPRESSED
                
                   Doesn't matter how much you prove yourself, you will be graded on your personality, your political views and variables out of your control. The textbook is hardly used. You will have to song & dance your way to an A by his standards. He will refrence his prior job of selling life insurance & degrade your dreams by challenging you in front of class
                
                   Took grad mktg. What I liked abt Dr. Owen was that he actually took time to read my assignment/tests & give personal feedback.Also asked for help & he walked me thru until I understood.Takes into consideration student workload over course of semester & will lighten tasks.Prof. has promise to be fab quality but is over-scheduled. Knows his stuff.
                
                   Tests are easy from his study guides. Hardly used the book. Very vague on his projects for an online course. Uses discussion board to post requirements but does so through many posts that are not clearly marked and are vague.
                
                   Horrible professor, I dont know how he is still teaching.
                
                   This guy loves to hear himself talk.  He even interrupts the VIP guests.  The class was easy, but Bob is a bit annoying.  I don't feel like I learned much from him.  It's a required class for the mba and msba program with no other choice for profs.
                
                   Not a very good teacher, you will not learn anything about Marketing; you just learn how to make him money with his consultant business.
                
                   Changes his mind about requirements as often as he blinks.
                
                   Professor Arne was great. I love his perspective, being from Slovenia and just from another part of the world. Marketing is obviously his passion and he gets you to think from the other side of the marketing gimmick.  A+ professor who cares about his topics, tries to inspire his students, and overall just cares about his discussions. Come to class!
                
                   Good professor expects a team marketing plan to be done gives credit for attendance lectures are confusing but overall easy teacher
                
                   This professor was extremely unorganized, provided little feedback if any at all. He was super late with grading and just chose not to display some of the grades. You have to use Blackboard to email him and he doesn't respond for a week most times. This whole course is based off a simulation and you hardly have to use the book. Stay on top of him!!
                
                   Great teacher. Probably the best teacher I have had at this university. His assignments are clear and if you pay attention, it's easy to get a good grade. 
                
                   The class has ALOT of quizzes. They are 10 minutes, 10 questions, short answerfill-in-the-blank, with one attempt. Luckily there are no exams or additional homework assignments. BUT there is a paper for which he gives some pretty vague instructions for. The whole class is self paced too so just do the work early and you'll get an A. 
                
                   6 or 7 quizzes all online. Have the book and google and you won't have a problem passing this class. This class was 8 weeks online, I finished it on a weekend. 
                
                   22 Quizzes no weekly due date but don't wait til end to complete the quizzes (2 Attempts per quiz), 1 Research Paper w/presentation, no group project, class attendance not required.
                
                   Prof English was very helpful. I would recommend his class!
                
                   Great teacher. He's a little grumpy but overall he is great. Doesn't require attendance but readng the book is mandatory. You will not pass the class without reading the entire book. No papers or exams. There are just chapter based quizzes which are 10 questions/10 minutes.
                
                   Best professor I've had at TAMUCT.  Fantastic and enjoyable!
                
                   Very hard 8 week course. 22 quizes in 8 weeks. Must read 3 long hard chapters a week. Plus, write a business case. Very difficult quizes. Can barely find the info in the text. I am very happy it is over.
                
                   MKT 508 is a continuation from MKT 500.  The course itself is very interesting.  You do not need to purchase a textbook because he also provides you with the information you need for the exam. Professor tries to recap what was cover previously.  If you like jokes this may be the professor for you.
                
                   Having Dr. Salazar as an online professor was a relatively positive experience for me. The rubric clearly highlights everything that's expected of you throughout the course, and if followed, should be your key to achieving a high grade. While Dr. S is very prompt and responsive to messages, she is much slower to grade course assignments.
                
                   I enjoyed the subject matter of the class. She is very passionate about marketing and teaching. I felt like there was a lot of disorganization. Take notes. She gave us a review and setup a review outside of class. Attend them if you can or get with someone to send you the notes.  She counts participation, but not necessarily attendance. 
                
                   This a great teacher to take this class with. She really loves her field and tries to make you love it as well. Class has four "papers" which are not to hard and a final paper that was fairly easy. On the tests there is usually and essay question or a place to write a graph so you have to be ready for the tests. Participation points are given.
                
                   Great to be around and very inspiring teacher.
                
                   Great professor! would take her again, she took time out from her Saturdays and did study session! go to the sessions, they are very helpful! I went to all 4 of them and made an A on all 4 exams, she gives you a chance to correct your grade as well, I loved her class, shes very passionate about marketing, made me want change my major to marketing.
                
                   Dr. D. Salazar is very passionate about Marketing. She loves participation and hands out index when you partake in discussion. She teaches what she knows and not so much from text because she did not like the book.  She will give a review for test on Saturdays, for the most part they help. You have 4 journals (little hard) 1 project (not too hard)
                
                   Choose another Professor. She doesn't know how to teach.
                
                   Dr. M was far and away the best prof at A&M Commerce that I have taken.  She "gets" the online format better than anyone, resulting in a better learning experience.  She is fair and extremely engaged in posted discussions.  I wish she had taught every class I took at TAMU-Commerce. (PS: to Ratemyprofessor: why is "easiness" a good thing?)
                
                   My advice as a former student who took this class with Alma that if you like to work hard and gain nothing then take her. She is very arrogant and rude. She is very hard and tough. 
                
                   Great teacher. I have taken two classes from her already and plan to take a third. Participate more than the minimum requirement, read the assigned reading and take your time on the papers and you will do fine.
                
                   Extremely RUDE emails. She is hard to deal with and hard to communicate with. Her class was a waste of time and money. 
                
                   She is awful. Very bad professor. Exams are from another planet
                
                   Dr. Mintu's teaching style was vagued. Don't think of taking any class with this professor , you won't pass.
                
                   Dr. Mintue is the baddest professor you would ever have,  she is not there for the students. Busy with her family all the time( especially with her son and his school TCU). She gives too many homework.  Her exams are the hardest. Don't think of taking this class with her ever.  
                
                   Big NO NO!!
                
                   Don't take her.
                
                   4 Case studies(100pts), 2 Exams(200pts), and plenty of discussion boards(100pts). You MUST be active if want the full participation. active meaning posting for every a plethora of posts. not just 5 or 6. I thought I was going to get a B but I received an A. She was helpful and I learned alot. I would take her again in a heartbeat.
                
                   Very inspirational. Participation is must. Exams are multiple choice and some short answers
                
                   First, when doing online, you get 2-3 days tops per week to get homework done. You can't do any homework early either, so you can't work weeks in advance. The mid-term and final is only open for 48 hours. So time management is critical.  Second, you don't have to interact with other students online. You can just speakrespond to her questions.
                
                   THIS PROFESSOR WILL NOT WORK WITH YOU.  Extremely RUDE emails.  Her class is too easy, but she is hard to deal with and  hard to communicate with.  Her class was a waste of time and money if you ask me.
                
                   Only 2 tests (Mid-term and Final). 4 Cases.  Discussion board is a must, you cannot miss one post.  Be sure and answer every question for your cases for maximum points.  Tests are cut and dry - material comes straight from the book.  Read, do well on your cases, stay engaged on the discussion boards and you'll be fine. Stick to the syllabus!!!
                
                   Make Sure you get the book! Be ready to pull topics from each lecture to put in your case studies
                
                   Great instructor! Very involved with class instructions. If you have questions she is willing to clarify, but will not repeat herself, rather point you to the already posted information. 4Paper requirements are simple, 1pg and easily attainable. Exams can be challenging, but if you skim the book you will do fine. Timeline requirements good. Easy A!
                
                   I'd recommend others to consider taking Professor Mintu. She's clear and very engaging with the class. Her exams are challenging so time manage while you work through it. The case studies aren't so bad either. Just makes you a bit nervous to cram info into 1 page if you write a great deal like I do. But overall manageable course to get a good grade
                
                   Dr M is highly engaged with the students and a fair grader. She has very high expectations and her exams are challenging. Participation is key and will help your grade. She was highly responsive to questions and emails and made you think.  Excellent course. i wish more professors cared this much and participated in their online courses.
                
                   Instructor has high expectations for each student. Students have the opportunity to get grades from exams, discussions, and short cases. As long as a student is trying, the instructor will be as helpful as possible. Instructor is very interactive and expects the same of each student.
                
                   I took the online MKT 501 online course. He meets online by voice chat 1 x per week. His communication style and heavy accent make it very, very difficult to understand. Confusing! He does not teach the course, prepare to fully teach yourself 110% of this course. Avoid his course at all cost. He's not a teacher.
                
                   I was very disappointed in this professor's inability to provide clarity for any of our assignments. His feedback for our paper was generic and completely nonspecific. He waits until the last week to clearly explain the paper after you've written it. His emails are run-on sentences. The material is interesting, but his teaching abilities are poor.
                
                   I had this professor for MKT571:B2B Marketing and MKT572:Seminar in Marketing Research. I don't get why he is rated so low here. I learned a lot. His lectures are very helpful. You'll have 4 or 5 DBs during a Spring or Fall term, a group project, and a couple of exams. Use his companion book, attend lectures, stop whining, do the work, get an A. 
                
                   This professor is a nightmare and his class is a waste of time and money. By far the worst professor I've had at TAMUC. You write a great post, he says it wasn't what he was looking for and gives you a 20100 on it. Really!? Ask for clarification and you'll get "I've already explained it." Horrible, avoid like the plague...
                
                   Here is my two cents.  Overall tests are easy, and discussion posts are easy.  Final paper will kill your grade.  Each week he discusses the project, however the final week he begins to discuss more.  Guidelines are APA but difficult when doing a market analysis.  Cite a source in each section, and ask lots of questions.  Just be careful.  Goodluck
                
                   Too tough on reviewing papers or discussion questions in which he does not even know what he is talking about. Lacks communicating his thoughts effectively. Skip this teacher if at all possible.
                
                   In MKT 501 we had to do 4 discussions (one for each week) and take 4 tests (one for each week). We had to do a group paper which I had to spend too much time on because I did not know what to do till last week. Only during last week lecture he walked us through the syllabus and made clear what is expected. This was suppose to be done during week 1.
                
                   I am really confused as to what everyone else is saying  Dr. Myers was very clear with expectations and followed the syllabus. Of course you have to write its a graduate course people, but it is nothing unbearable. I would definitely take him again. Easy A with a little bit of effort.
                
                   It was VERY confusing.  I did however feel I learned something during the course.  It's a master's level course online so if you can't handle teaching yourself some of the material, then you shouldn't take this class.
                
                   I would not recommend taking this professor. I do not feel as though I learned anything, and spend several hours just trying to understand his instructions. When I asked multiple times for clarity, his responses generally stated that he explained it already. I barely got a B in the class. Its not a hard class, just avoid this professor.
                
                   He gives 3 page min. for case studies, which you must know is impossible to go into detail when you have only 3 pages to work with. He counts off BIG points for not going in "depth" when he only gives you 3 pages to work with. I have had several classes with this man and would NEVER reccommend him to ANYONE. Terrible grader-terrible communicator!
                
                   Rude. Difficult to understand.  Weak on detail and subject matter.  Very poor instructor.
                
                   This is by far the best professor I have had at A&M. I am currently in his 501 class and had reservations based on earlier reviews, but find I love the class and the professor is very knowledgable and accessible. If follow the directions and think about the issues at hand you will do fine. Think outside the box!
                
                   Hold on to your seat...many times late and very unclear as to his instructions. You are required to attend his online lectures, yet he may not show for 15-20 minutes into his own lecture. His response times run minimal a week plus.  I would not recommend taking his class unless your ready for the mayhem.
                
                   Don?t Do It. I recently had Dr. Myers for and it was a complete nightmare. He has no idea what he?s talking about and the syllabus contradicts what he says to do in class. There is no point asking questions for clarification that will simply not happen. For one unclear project you will spend hundreds of hours, frustrated and ready to quit school. D
                
                   I hope you read this before signing up with this teacher.  By far the worst professor ever.  Unfair in assessments, chat requirements, group project and overall teaching attempt.  This professor may ruin your career and desire to continue your education.  TX A&M get rid of this guy!!
                
                   Avoid this guy !!!
                
                   He does know marketing but he is a very bad teacher , he does not make sense sometimes and if you argue with him you are going to realize that he is not smart at all and that you are wasting your time. If you want to learn stay away.
                
                   He has NO IDEA of MKT At All... no experience in MKT what so ever. Your ideas never good enough but when you ask him for reasoning, he cann't mention it to you. Because he doesn't have any knowledge in his brain.
                
                   I agree with the previous posts.  I am currently in his class and he is really useless.  I am waisting my time and money here absolutely learning nothing. He does not teach nor does he give any concrete explanations.  Your answers never seem good enough for him and when you ask him for his response he never gives you one.
                
                   Great teacher. Very focus in teaching. She requires alot of participation. The homeworks are long and tedious using online Learn Smart, but not hard. Exams were not hard and it was taken online. Did the 8 wk course at night but most nights we did not stayed the whole 3 hrs. More like 1hr and 45 mins. Would take her again for another course if able.
                
                   He communicates well and the assignments are not out of context.  He is a pretty good professor and conducts his online classes very well.  There is a quiz for each chapter and a research paper that must be done but it is a very manageable class.
                
                   This class was great, especially since I had never taken an online class and had some apprehensions about how I would do. But Dr. Kegans did a great job outlining the assignments and tests. If you read the book, the class was easy to manage. I would highly recomment Dr. Kegans to anyone!
                
                   Very easy class. I took the online stephenville course because the only professor at Central Tx. teaching this course is Floyd, which I was warned not to take. All assignments are review questions from the book and then discussion board questions from the book too. Very Easy.
                
                   He makes marketing dreadful.
                
                   Dr. Florey is by far the worst professor I have encountered.  I believe he's determined to see students fail.  He will bore you to death with stories about wealthy people he knows in Dallas (like we care).  He is constantly demeaning the Killeen community.  So why is he teaching here&#63;  The class is only hard because he doesn't teach what's on test!
                
                   The guy is a dufus and the class is a total waste of my time.
                
                   Must memorize terms, lectures do not reflect the tests.
                
                   Really interesting class. He's changed his method from the undergrad portion. I enjoy his class more as a graduate student. He knows a lot, but expect you to do your part. Not such a hard grader, but you do have homework and online (open book)quizzes to take. I would take him again =) People who complaint about him want an easy &quot;A&quot;
                
                   If you ask me, Dr. Florey is not fit to be teaching.  You will not learn anything about marketing in his class that you can't learn from opening your text-book.  I seriously think that he teaches in order to feed his superiority complex.  I could have spared myself a 45 minute drive to class by taking this course online.
                
                   He is a good professor and has alot of neat stories but you could read the book and show up for the test. His tests rarely reflect the lectures. His tests are dificult but multiple text readings should allow you to understand sufficiantly. he grades on a class standing curve. top 10% A next 10% B so on.
                
                   He is by far the worst profesor I have had in my entire college career.  I graduate in May so I have taken a lot of classes.  He is a disgrace to my college which I really enjoy.
                
                   Fun lecturer. Test bank he uses is wack! Test questions dont seem to reflect true book content. If you have ability to read and retain, remember his lecture anecdotes, and connect the two, you will do well.  I take notes and have an A.
                
                   Wow... Never had a Prof that consistently talks about meaningless things... Then expects the class to know the book to know the book cover to cover. The tests are barely readable by anyone less than a doctor... Yeah... we get it guy, you are smarter than us- and apparently you don't want us to get any smarter by the way you teach!
                
                   he was so boring...&quot;Are you with me, are you with me...jsut knod&#63;&quot; OMgoodness  I failed every test and studied really hard. Didn't know what to study for the test because he did not give reviews.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Boring, study your book because that's the only source of learning you will get, he constantly goes off topic, at times his comments are not politically correct, he can make women and minorities feel uncomfortable during class.
                
                   There isn't too much to this class. Two exams, a couple of discussion boards, and a Learnsmart module for each chapter. No papers. It's cut and dry. The Learnsmart modules can have up to 60 or 70 questions though, but it's just time comsuming. Either way, take this class with her.
                
                   Ms. Carey was a great online professor. The assignments and grading criteria in the rubric were very clear and easy to understand. The course consisted of several assignments per week done through McGraw-Hill's Connect LearnSmart platform. Granted, this was an 8-week course so it was slightly fast-paced, but even then, it was easy to keep up with.
                
                   Ms. Carey is an awesome professor! I wish I had her for all classes. I highly recommend her to everyone. Took her Marketing class at A&M and as long as you read the textbook, you will do well! Journal entries can be challenging, but that's ok because they are to make sure you understand what you are learning throughout the semester. Love her! :)
                
                   Very Easy Class, Recommend Online. Work assignments every week but very easy if you have your book on hand!
                
                   She does group projects and individual projects, but they are interesting.  You won't mind the effort you have to put into the project because it will be very helpful to your career in the future. She assigns about two assignments a week, but they are simple.  Her exams go along with her lectures.
                
                   She really knows her stuff.  She's one of the best teachers that I have ever had.  She will always help you out and will be there to answer questions.  If you have any issues, don't hesitate to ask her because she will work with you.  Very enjoyable class/professor.
                
                   She kept class interesting.  She is very knowledgeable about marketing.  She assigns interesting and fun projects that you actually want to do, not boring ones that you won't ever care about again after the class is finished.  I actually learned a lot.
                
                   Ms Carey keeps class very interesting.  She is always willing to help you if you have any questions.  She assigns about one to two assignments a week, but they are not complicated at all.  I passed the class by attending the classes and listening to her lecture.  I've never read a chapter and still got an A in the class.
                
                   There was about 2 things due each week during the 16 week course online. This class is very smooth sailing. Id say the first week or two were the most complex because all of my classes started out crazy. Definitely would take this class online. There is no reason to be worried about this one!
                
                   Only had to attend the class once a week so she did keep attendance. She doesnt clarify alot of things because some things on the test you wont remember her talking about but if you just read the chapters and will be good for the test.On the test she doest give points so just do the homework and atleast try on your exams andyou will pass her class.
                
                   Prof. Thompson is a great asset to the University! He is a practical educator versus a teacher (ie. doesn't just recite slides), so be prepared to learn. I thoroughly enjoyed his class, even though a lot of work was given. I am not a marketing major, however if I was I would sign up for all his classes!!!
                
                   Excellent instructor, probably one of the best in the department. Definitely an asset to the school. Classes are not a calk-walk, you will do weekly assignments and he requires a lot interaction, but that is not a bad thing. He seeks to expand your horizons. NOT A HARD CLASS. Took him for three classes.
                
                   Professor Thompson is a great professor with the background and insight needed to teach a class like this. He gets the students involved in the lectures. You have to do a weekly discussion board, a weekly paper, and a mid-term and final. Do the work and it's difficult to not make an A or B in this class. Very interesting and important subject.
                
                   Great Teacher, gets everyone interested and involved. I was upset when I had to miss class, great teacher. Work is challenging and demanding, but he makes you want to do it and look forward to it. Great discussions!
                
                   He is a great teacher but gives a lot of work, but its do able must use the book for aplia assignments. Participate In class do discussions and do he assignments and you will be fine . I also got a B very close to an A :( but its ok
                
                   Professor Thompson is awesome. Keeps class involved and fun. Nobody minds participating in the conversation. Assignments are easy as all you have to do is state your opinion. I made an easy B almost an A. I would definitely take him again but I am switching majors.
                
                   liked the class.  Really liked prof. Thompson.
                
                   Gives a lot of work during the week and keeps you busy.  Expects you to be active in class and often calls out on students to participate.  Exams are open book.  Group project is  the only obstacle (communicating) in this course and is worth 1/3 of your grade. Great class....recommend.
                
                   Tons of work.  It is not difficult, just a big workload.
                
                   Great professor! Very clear on what she expects. Read and do the online assignments and quizzes and class should be an A. She does assign 1 group project but its easy.  
                
                   I do not recommend this class to those who try really hard to get "A"s like myself(I got all "A" s from other class except this one. As some other individual commented here that group project called "Marketing Plan" was painful experience. She just group people by last names no consideration of any consequences. Final exam was nightmare! don't take
                
                   Professor Siegal is a great professor. She presents the materials in her class in a very user-friendly manner. She engages with students in conversation during lecture and you do all work/homework/tests online. Just study some and do your work and you will make an A or B in her class.
                
                   I took the class as a hybrid class. Attended class once a week. Just do you assignments online and your test, you will be fine. She make you write your name on a paper for row call. She knows her material very well and is a great professor.
                
                   As long as you do your work on time and get a good grade on the test, you CAN get an A. You have to write on three blogs and homework online every week. You do have one group project, so make sure you pick people that are going to do their work.
                
                   Professor is Hot and looks like Jennifer Aniston. The class was easy-going, straight forward and informative. The professor is knowledgeable and provided lots of extra credit! There is no way you can fail if you give it half a try. Read and do the project = A
                
                   As long as you study the vocabulary words and know their meaning, you'll do fine on the exams. Attendance does count, she makes you sign-in everyday. She requires a group-project and a presentation. Very easy class if you stay focus and do your work on time!
                
                   Easy class. I took the hybrid class. Had easy homework assignments each week that you do online, that of which probably take about 1/2 hour to 45 min at the most. Exams are easy. Hardest thing was the group project, but as long as you start ahead of time and dont do it last min, you'll be fine. Take her if you can!
                
                   Tests are very difficult. The way the team projects are graded are extreme and unfair to your overall grade in the class. Seems most people get low grades in this class.
                
                   Study the definitions and read the chapters and you will be fine.  Use buzz words from chapters in cases studies.
                
                   she is very easy. take this prof any chance you get. tests are easy lots of group work
                
                   Very helpful and explained the material very well. Highly recommended.
                
                   Witty sense of humor.  Gives students ample opportunity to succeed.  You are lazy and don't belong in College if you fail her class.  Grab a hairnet and go to work.
                
                   Dr. Coleman teaches a critical thinking marketing class, where you apply topics (seemingly unrelated) at the beginning of the semester to one thread.  His  in class manner can come across as abrasive, but it is designed to stimulate conversation and gain topic understanding.  Take this class if you want to learn where marketing is going. 
                
                   Grading was confusing and unless you think like him, you'll get docked on your grade. Class attendance is mandatory so make sure you go. Not very approachable and feedback on assignments was rather rude. Would not take him again if possible. Overall, not a hard class and speakers were pretty interesting. 
                
                   I took this class in the summer and honestly it wasn't that bad. (for being a summer class) Only thing I didn't like was the amount of questions we had on our homework.
                
                   I was very offended by the way he gives feedback. Sometimes very unprofessionally, and downright rude. I was looking forward to the class, but with another professor, when he showed up the first day I knew it was going to be horrible. Horrible for seminar and horrible for this class. I REGRET taking him. GREATLY. I feel as if I learned nothing.
                
                   Attended seminar in marketing req. class for MBA. Interesting class and like the professor.
                
                   Not good on the class and he had no idea on what he wanted to be on grading...This year for MBA class he confused the whole class on his grading. I won't signup for any class.
                
                   Difficult to know what he wanted because it seemed he was making up the assignments as he went along.  This was very stressful for those of us who like being prepared.  Nonetheless I would take the class again because the guest speakers were amazing and really expanded my view of marketing.
                
                   The prof is OK.  He wants to teach/make you aware of what's happening in the field of MKTG.  However, his assignments are subjective; that is, there is no one right answer.  But if your answer doesn't match with what he thinks your answer should be, then you get penalized on your score. Bottom like: if you think like him, you'll make a good grade.
                
                   The class itself was easy, but the quizzes, midterm and final was very hard. You must read and understand the concept. I would not recommend him to anyone.
                
                   The wors teacher ever. He tells us in class that he will slam your grade down.  Not good at all. He is very disappointing
                
                   Go to class and study for the test and you will be fine.
                
                   To be ready for this prof you must read the text and make notes(good notes) from the lectures. I expected to make it by with a B but failed to do as well on the written assignments. He tends to grade the written assignments as though he was an English prof. You have been warned. Take any other prof if possible. He's a nice guy but its your grade!
                
                   he thinks he's the Dean- he has little patience, don't talk-just listen attitude, tests are difficult multiple choice, interesting lectures- I wouldn't recommend
                
                   He's ok just make sure to understand all material.
                
                   Took Marketing and HR with him.  Study what he tells you and you will be fine.
                
                   Needs to do a better job on how test are designed...too much confusion on which answer is correct.
                
                   Great teacher. test are challenging but if you study what he lectures you'll be alright.
                
                   Class and material very easy but teacher very boring.  It's better if the class is smaller because he's less uptight.
                
                   You either love him, hate him, or skip class everyday.  The material is interesting but he isn't.
                
                   The professor is very helpful if you reach out to him directly.  I found the class very interesting.  The only negative that I would mention is that he has a team that does the grading and one of the individuals that graded the case studies was never consistent in her grading and if you ask her to explain there is little to no response.   
                
                   Great professor! He definitely has a passion for marketing, so if that's your passion. He's perfect for you! Not the easiest class but definitely worth knowing, great connections!
                
                   Impossible to get an A. His tests are designed to trick you no matter how much you study. Each class is worth 5 points, can't miss. You have to pay for an online thing to do homework. It's stupid. So glad to be done with his class.
                
                   Dr. Byus has a lot of real-world knowledge, but has a tendency to do his lectures in the form of highly conceptual discussions with the class. Be sure you read every chapter, it makes a WORLD of difference when taking his tests. He's super nice and super helpful, and wants everyone to do well.
                
                   Tests were kind of difficult, because they are from the book which we don't really cover in class or in slides. You actually have to read to do well on the tests. He's really helpful, and uses real world examples. I'd def. take him again.
                
                   Very helpful, kind man . He helps students that aim higher, I was borderline A and he gave it To me due to my effort in class. Easy class but boring, tests were mostly online which is great. Highly recommended for any class
                
                   Dr Byus has real world experience.  Really interactive lecture style.  Uses humor well.  I will take his classes again
                
                   Makes lectures very interesting and often funny! Lectures do not come straight from the book so reading is a must if you want to pass exams and quizzes! Uses real world examples that are easy to understand. Assigns long term projects that are extrememly useful in learning what to expect in the real world, but they require some work
                
                   He uses the real business examples that make students easy to understand and useful for later career. For his test, read the book and you are totally fine.
                
                   Awesome professor! And far and away the best MKTG professor at TAMUCC. Makes lectures very interesting. You will actually really learn something in this class.  Also, I don't get all the comments on here that he is hard.  This is one of the easier As I've gotten.  Just show up and do the online tests and you're golden.  Highly recommend.
                
                   Dr. Byus is a great professor.  He really knows his stuff and make class interesting, which is unheard of with some of the TAMUCC professors.  I took his Maymester class, he works you hard but it is over in two weeks and well worth it!
                
                   You can learn alot from Dr.Byus he's a pretty cool professor but his test material never seemed to reflect the lectures. BEWARE! You have to know random facts in the book that he pulls out so lots of reading and memorization is required. Although you get to use a resource sheet at times, it doesn't really help.
                
                   Dr. Byus was a great professor. He has been my favorite!!
                
                   Made you feel like an idiot if your answer didn't match his. Acted as if he were a god delivering a sermon to the mere mortals at his feet. Went a couple times to get help outside of class time and was made to feel that I was bothering him and keeping him away from his business(es&#63;) that he operates on the side. Finally withdrew.
                
                   A dedicated teacher with lots of useful wisdom and insight. Highly recommended.
                
                   Not responsive to questions. Would give a 15 minute lecture when asked a simple question and I would still not get an answer.
                
                   Has students' interest at heart but expresses it in a unique way.  He sometimes gets TOO passionate with his &quot;constructive criticism&quot; and loses his cool.  Good luck!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great Professor. Has the students best interest at heart.
                
                   Dr. Yan was a very good professor who I have taken several times now.  The classes are fairly straight forward with usually a comprehensive group project and two exams.  Get in a decent group early, meet the deadlines and everything is gravy.  Exams are all multiple choice, and not terribly difficult if you study.
                
                   Dr. Yan, is an excellent instructor. He has exceeded my expectations and I would highly recommend him for International Marketing. I learned so much in his class as well as felt that Dr. Yan really cared about my academic success. He was so understanding and even allowed retake exams, if we didn't do good on his exams the first time.
                
                   Tests were not too bad as long as you read the assigned chapters, with notes, and participate in the discussion board. Definitely get a head start on the final paper.
                
                   I wanted an easy class to bring my GPA up, and actually enjoyed the textbook it increased my useless facts knowledge HOWEVER, Yan's test are tough 50 questions 75 minutes PLUS the Q's are super tricky and in the middle of a paragraph something you wouldn't remember. Then challenged questions that verbatim I got wrong and wasn't resolved.
                
                   TERRIBLE instructor! No guidance, didn't like questions. Impossible grading. All exams multiple choice and verbatim from book, but tough time limits. My first and only B and I tried very hard. We were told highest grade was a 90. I got an 88...the second highest grade. Didn't learn anything. Avoid at all costs.
                
                   Never instructed, no involvement, no lectures, etc.  Never set up the online environment, left the template and cludged add-ons. Assignments had nothing to do with course subject. No feedback. Put as little effort into the class as possible and then assigned grades to make the curve look right at the end.  Useless.
                
                   Dr. Yan is friendly and will help when asked via email.  However, his syllabus and instructions are confusing and do not match up requiring you to ask many questions.  Provides little to no feedback as to why you missed points.  Must read book to do well.  Class consists of 3 tests and 2 written assignments accounting for about 95% of grade.
                
                   Good professor. As long as you read the text book and participate in weekly posting you will do great. Exams are good, make sure you take the practice exams. It helps. Papers are okay as well. Professor is very helpful when asked.
                
                   She was a really nice teacher! The work load is not too much. Plus all of the assignments are posted at the beginning of the semester. She grades very fair. I really enjoyed her!
                
                   Took this online. Super easy class. All tests are straight from the textbook - in order, and mostly just definitions. Other than that, a few discussions and quick assignments, and you're done. Would recommend!
                
                   A lot of assignment. She doesn't reply the emails I sent and doesn't grade the assignments.
                
                   Weekly online sessions are the worst that I have encountered--and I have taken a lot of online classes in the last few years.  Don't expect any feedback on grades--which are going to be weeks late.  You have to do assignments on regular basis which are fairly simple but no feedback so you have no idea how you're doing.  I wish she'd keep up.
                
                   Class material is not very difficult, but I think the way she compensates for that is to assign a lot of busy work.  Between the group marketing plan, the case and discussions, you will have your plate full.  Dr. Toombs gives really great feedback.  My biggest gripe is that I think she only checks email once a week as she does not respond timely.
                
                   One of the best professor ever. Her sessions are based on real life marketing issues. Her feedback on papers and assignments is stellar. She is knowledgeable and always is asking for your input in the online sessions, so they are very interactive. Dr. Toombs is a good fit to teach the MBA program. Her teaching techniques encourage students .
                
                   Had to email several times to get any response although email is preferred method of communication.  Projects submitted 8 weeks ago are yet to be graded so I have no idea how I'm doing in this class or even what she is looking for. Group project is the usual painful experience.  On-line lectures are clear and informative.
                
                   Although she presented the material well during the weekly meetings, Dr. Toombs does not reply to emails, virtual office posts, and grades very, very, very slowly.   
                
                   good
                
                   The biggest problem with this professor is that she doesn't respond to you.  We had a group project that needed to be done and we asked for help.  We had to ask several times.  It took her almost 2 weeks to get back to us. This happened on several occasions, it was actually a joke with our whole group.  VERY easy, but no help when you need it.
                
                   A challenging class. I just finished the Summer II 5 week term and I must say, between the marketing plan and the case study, your personal life will be over for a couple of weeks. Dr. Toombs' sessions were helpful. The test required a knowledge of the textbook concepts. Now, the worst part of the class was the teams. People are very unreliable.
                
                   Course was difficult in the summer due to group project. There was 1 group paper, 1 case, 2 discussions and 1 exam. Each assignment requires heavy use of the online databases for journals. The group work was hard to complete in 5 weeks, wish we had more time to coordinate work. Last the exam is from textbo0k so understand the concepts.
                
                   Usefully weekly sessions. Group project seemed irrelevant to course material. Slow to respond to email. Group project was painful (b/c of other students, not teacher). Final exam difficult. Do well on paper and you should ace the class.
                
                   Do not take her class, she does not respond to emails at ALL. You will get NO feed back and she does not grade in a timely manner. Don't even try reporting her to her boss, because the more you report her the less you get from her.
                
                   To say that she is unreasonable is a complete understatement, the class is based on 3 case studies (that she grades harshly because she expect more than she gives off), a group project that is worth 40% of your grade, and one final exam! I would never recommend anyone take her. Its already the end of the semester and I have missing grades.
                
                   Class was easy but this instructor is unreasonable. She puts you in groups and your grade is based on what others say about you, not your work. She gets intimidated by good writers and will berate you in front of your group. Should have received an A, but ended up with a B. I do not believe instructor is 'educated'. Bad grammar in syllabus.
                
                   Dr. Toombs is the worst teacher I've had, to date. She was incredibly slow to grade papers, will NOT respond to your emails although she states it's the method of communication you should use, she gets off topic during class live sessions, and has poor grading techniques. I would NOT recommend her. Find another teacher if MKT 521 is a requirement!
                
                   VERY frustrated with this professor. NEVER replied to any emails. Grades and feedback for cases not given back when promised. This information could have been used for the following case, instead we received the info after the case was due.  Overall not a good experience at all. Find another professor for this course!  VERY disappointed.
                
                   This professor lacks effective communication skills regarding timely response to academic emails.  She is a procrastinator when it comes to grading assignments.  Prepare to be extremely frustrated with this professor.
                
                   Overall I thought the course was informative.  Some of the discussion sessions, although not required, seemed to wander but a lot of fundamental marketing themes were discussed.
                
                   I took this professor for marketing 501 and made an A. She requires long papers with tons of supporting references (the more the better) and demands proper APA format. Overall a good course and not too hard!
                
                   Overall I enjoyed this class.
                
                   great teacher....reallly nice and fun to be around in the classroom. very understanding of a lot of things. Shes not as easy as everyone thinks you have to at least be a decent student to do well in her class, but if you are, you will be fine.
                
                   what a great person' very kind hearted; really understands people, life and christian values
                
                   Wow she's the best professor ever!  She's the sweetest one on campus, she wants everyone to pass and have good grades, she helps in every way she can, she gives bonus points, she makes it simple and you learn a lot from her.  I'd take her for every class if I could!  Actually, I've taken 5 total with her, and loved everyone of them!
                
                   OMG, The easiest class ever. She hands out points for every thing, showing up to class, bring scantrons, gives a review with extra points, points for showing up the day after the test, give the questions to test at the review. EVERYONE PASSED THE FIRST TEST WITH FLYING COLORS!!!! teaches at high school level, did not learn any thing waste of money!
                
                   she's a very easy teacher, and a lot of fun. You can talk to her about anything and usually talk her out of doing work in class. the freshman seminar class is an easy class anyway, but she didn't make us do as much as some other teachers I knew of. Very helpful and caring!
                
                   Russ is a  fun, helpful, but terrible teahcer. She doesnt explain things very well though and always cancels class, pretty much a waste of time for a class. Her extra, free points are awesome.
                
                   Her class is a waste of time. All she does is read word for word from either the overhead or the textbook. She loves to give out free points on tests for little things... like showing up for class! I don't know how our business program is nationally ranked when we have teachers like this. Don't expect to learn anything. Easy A!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Ms. Russ is a very good teacher and really likes to help her student.  A true professional in every sense of the word.  Great.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very hot
                
                   Hot professor and you don't have to learn much for her classes.
                
                   Hot teacher.  Very easy and you don't have to learn much.
                
                   Easiest professor.
                
                   Courtney is more like a friend than a professor.  She cares and makes it easy to get a good grade.
                
                   Very Inspirational and a true representative of the word &quot;Marketing&quot;. Class is laid back and she has incredible appearance.  Professors like her will help establish A&M Commerce as a top tier b-school.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great Professor.  Very easy on the eyes and great personality.
                
                   Great professor to take.  In 306 take her or Myers
                
                   Gnerally very pretty smile and cares for her students.  Needs to work at being more challenging.
                
                   14 assignments requiring around an hour on McGraw-Hill each to complete (test question review).  14 assignments or review quizzes over the McGraw-Hill review material.  3 tests that are 75 multiple choice questions and 90 minutes to complete the exam (exams are only open for 1 day.)  eBook was enough for online summer class.
                
                   He's an excellent teacher there are no exams the exams are formatted as quizzes.
                
                   Misinformation, no information, missing documents, wrong due dates and broken web links.  Forced to pay an additional $80.00 to Connect to complete your homework. One minute and twenty seconds max time to answer test questions. Group project.  Textbook required. 
                
                   Easy class .Never there when you need her. She lives in Dallas so if your in a pinch dont expect her to help out much. Nice lady though personally and you can carry on an intelligent conversation with her, she know a lot though.
                
                   Awesome Prof!  Very interested in her students and knows a lot about the topic; she is especially helpful if you're into political marketing.
                
                   teacher is unclear about her tests very boring and doesn't know how to teach. Everything is on her own time.
                
                   Easy subject to get thru.  Just stick with it even tho class can be pretty boring.  She's pretty good about understanding when you have to miss.  She had no problem giving makeup exams, which I appreciated.
                
                   Generally good prof.  Pretty easy.
                
                   She should give up on Dean
                
                   Dosen't care about students, all she cares about is her diet pills.
                
                   She has a lot of real world experience that I found helpful. I think with a little more time she will be a great professor.  I have learned much from her classes.  She takes an interest in students as far as career wise which I really appreciated.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Still too early to tell.  She does seem to care.
                
                   This is Bush country so talking about Dean isn't good.
                
                   o.k. around the mid-point for good students.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She tries to be very helpful but sometimes has trouble with time management.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Professor Ingram had another job in San Francisco that evidently took too much time for her to deal with this course. She would not return, emails, was disorganized,   would not specify formatting guidelines for papers, and  took over a month to correct  them. She was NOT there for students at all this semester.
                
                   Be best online professor at TAMUC I have encountered.  She is timely and gives great feedback on all homework.  You have weekly discussions, a few projects, and 2 tests (mid-term and final.)  This is my second class with Professor Ingram, and she is so organized and her syllabus is clearly laid out.
                
                   Great class.  Four writing assignments (not long at all), midterm, final, and one discussion board per week.  This class was not bad at all.  Professor Ingram was good at responding to e-mails and grades easy.  The midterm and final are timed (2 hours) for 50 questions.  Wish all classes were this stress free.
                
                   I would recommend Ingram for BA 303. There are only two exams. Exams come straight from the book. There are weekly discussions that count for a grade. The other writing assignments are straight forward and pretty easy. You will make an A if you put in the effort. She can sometimes take a while to email you back. 
                
                   Not much work in this class. 3 exams, a mid-term paper, ethics paper and 4 self-assessment papers. If you do the work you will get an A. The book is required. Exams come straight from the book. I strongly recommend Professor Ingram. 
                
                   The course material was clear cut. She provided exact steps to success of assignments in the syllabus. The book is a must have or you will not pass the class.
                
                   Her exams are straight from the book.  The self assessment assignments are a little tedious.  She does take a while to post grades.  Over all, easy A.  Can't say I learned a lot, but got an A.
                
                   Fun class and fun teacher, She really cares for her students. Just do your work and don't procrastinate. She is also good eye candy. ;)
                
                   Professor Ingram does a great job of how she outlines her course. You have discussions every week, but you do not have to post to every single one of them. She counts your posts at the end of the semester and gives you a grade based on participation. I really like that. She also has 4 exams and 1 paper. Pretty standard syllabus, not complicated.
                
                   Took class over Summer 2 for 5 weeks with another management course. Not too difficult at all. Manageable course load and a 5 page paper. An A is definately possible by following her instructions.
                
                   Dr Ingram's class is very straight forward.  Read the material, pay attention to due dates and you should be fine. If you are really interested in Management or HR, then the book will be an easy read because its actually pretty interesting.
                
                   This online class is extremely helpful in knowing more about self and others through self-assessments. Great information conveyed through the syllabus, assignments, and exams.
                
                   This was my second online course with Dr. Ingram, and she was great! Light work load (read, discussions, 4 exams, and an 8 page term paper)and there was ample time to complete the assignments. Exams came straight from the text. Very knowledgeable professor and wants her students to learn and succeed! I highly recommend her as an instructor!
                
                   Totally useless class - busy work that was not challenging. What she posted online never matched her syllabus in terms of assignments, guidelines, and due dates. Didn't respond to a single email I sent the entire semester and others had the same problem. That's completely unacceptable for an online class, especially when she won't take phone calls
                
                   Dr. Ingram is a great instructor. The workload is not bad at all and you have ample time to complete assignments. She is a little slow on answering emails and grading. Overall, just read the text and keep up with assignments and you'll get an A!
                
                   I do not care for her at all. She does not respond to emails, however demands you to do as told. She does not grade assignments fast. I would not recommend her, however she is the only one offering several classes I must take.
                
                   Easy professor, easy A class. Textbook is needed somewhat, though lecture notes will pretty much get you through quizzes and exam.  This professor does not respond if even if you send the email exactly as she asked.
                
                   She's awesome and her class is super easy online. The reason she has it set up so easily is because she wants you to actually learn. There is plenty of busy work, but you will actually end up learning a lot. The tests are incredibly easy and so are the papers.
                
                   Instructor is very easy and fair. Be prepared to dive into a large amount of group discussions. However, good luck trying to communicate with her. She may respond to emails within a weeks time and at times she doesn't at all. She also does not grade on a timely basis. I have waited weeks before seeing a grade.
                
                   Great professor. Very easy. Tests are straight from the book and questions are taken from the chapters in chronological order. Learned alot from this class about management. The self assessments are timely but the papers on them are simple and she gives you an A on them for just doing them.
                
                   Professor Doty as very disorganized and more of a class monitor than an instructor. She would not let us drop a student for social loafing and told us that we had to use threats to get him to perform since his part of the assignment was minimal, a copy and past special with improper citing (needed to be APA) and showed up for 1 of 6 meetings. 
                
                   She gives the most stupid multiple choice exams I have ever seen. The assignments are fair and she gives points for discussions but her exams are dreadful and she gives you less than a minute to answer the questions despite this being university not the SATs. This is supposed to be u. Unfortunately there are usually no other option to her classes.
                
                   Doty is very good at teaching these subjects. She has a group term project in both classes. I think there should be more time for the tests since the questions require critical thinking. But all in all I loved the classes
                
                   She is a great professor, though her tests are very difficult. She does not give you the time you need to take her exams efficiently. But she is always available for questions and responds clearly and quickly to emails!If you do your readings and understand their application you will be just fine in this class!
                
                   She is not clear with instructions and does not seem keen on helping students or communicating. The exams were 65min long for 75 multiple choice questions. I studied hard and could still barely make it through the tests in time. Tough grader and we were given almost no direction on the group project. Tons of discussions to type up.
                
                   Discussions and Key Terms pretty much takes all of your spare time.  Your required to take quizzes that don't count, and that are not anyway similar to tests given.  75 Questions per test, 1hr 10mins time limit.  Questions are not easy, and 45% of grade comes from exams.  Project was extensive for the group but good.  Course requires too much work
                
                   The tests are large. 75 questions, 70 minutes to finish. They are pretty easy. She counts off if you wait until the last minute to do discussion questions. She also grades hard on written assignments, so put a lot of effort in. Not a bad teacher, but she gives a ton of work. She only gave 2 weeks to finish a 15 page team research paper...
                
                   Very easy test, however she never grades assignments and lots of busy work. Easy A.
                
                   She graded the group project after the semester ended and she is not a good teacher so do not take her class to much hard work for nothing
                
                   She is not a good teacher and takes forever to graded and her tests are 75 questions with one hour and five mins which you do not have time to think . I do not recommend that teacher
                
                   Pretty easy class. Lots of discussions and definitions to do, but the exams are straight from the text. Ms. Doty was very helpful any time I had questions. One semester project, but it wasn't hard  to do at all. Keep up with the work, and you'll be fine! Pretty easy A!
                
                   Heavy on busy work and discussions.  Does respond quickly via email.   Tests straight from book.  There is a group project for the online course. Unclear on each of the project expectations which count highly toward final grade.
                
                   Not a bad professor. Would definitely recommend. Very helpful and timely in responding to emails. Test were not challenging and defintely straight from the book, recommend taking class online.
                
                   Gives about 10 essay questions ahead of time for test but about 4 will be on there. About 50 multiple choice questions on test. I only studied for the essays and got a &quot;B&quot; in the class. There is a 15-20 page paper that is groupwork and is also a ppt. 3 to 4 people in each group. Average in difficulty
                
                   Good Prof
                
                   class is really easy. Didn't ever go to class or study much more than an hour or two before each test and got an A.
                
                   Great prof! After graduating from tamu i must say that he is one of the few that i really look back on and enjoyed his class.
                
                   Really cool class.  Very interesting prof.  Make sure you go to class and write down all the examples he talks about.  Be able to apply what is learned in class.  Easy B and with some effort you'll have a chance at an A.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   awesome prof, very fair tests, just read the book
                
                   Very helpful man when it comes to a hard class. He will take time out to meet with you and discuss the class with you. He is very courteous and will answer your questions. I probably was not prepared as I should have been for his class. I took his class about 13 years ago. I do recommend him. Noticing he is still there, means he is doing a good job
                
                   He is amazing! He is the reason I changed my major to Marketing. If he is an option, TAKE HIM! Funny too.
                
                   There were several components of the class that made it difficult to juggle. A simulated group project, weekly discussion board, Case studies/ papers, reading, tests and exams. He is a fair grader but it was a lot of work. 
                
                   This is the worst professor I have ever had in my life. He should have never gotten his ten year. I have filed a offical complaint with the college of business. If you are taking his course drop it NOW!
                
                   Test is really tough, but not a lot of homework assignments, and class hardly ever went the full time.
                
                   The one and only test was pretty simple and straightforward. You need to ask for examples of marketing plans when you get to the group project stage or else you will have NO clue about what's going on. If you're group sucks, you can still get an A. Mine was great and I had way more fun doing it than I thought. 
                
                   We only took one test, but the material was covered during lectures. A bulk of the class was a group project, which was a lot of fun!
                
                   She is a bad teacher.
                